Washington statutes.
RCW 18.160.040

Certificate of competency—Contractor license.

(1) To become a certificate of competency holder under this chapter, an applicant must have satisfactorily passed an examination administered by the state director of fire protection. A certificate of competency holder can satisfy this examination requirement by presenting a copy of a current certificate of competency from the national institute for certification in engineering technologies showing that the applicant has achieved the classification of engineering technician level 3 or senior engineering technician level 4 in the field of fire protection, automatic sprinkler system layout. The state director of fire protection may accept equivalent proof of qualification in lieu of examination. This examination requirement is mandatory except as otherwise provided in this chapter.

(2) Every applicant for a certificate of competency shall fulfill the requirements established by the state director of fire protection under chapter 34.05 RCW.

(3) Every applicant for a certificate of competency shall make application to the state director of fire protection and pay the fees required.

(4) Provided the application for the certificate of competency is made prior to ninety days after May 1, 1991, the state director of fire protection, in lieu of the examination requirements of the applicant for a certificate of competency, may accept as satisfactory evidence of competency and qualification, affidavits attesting that the applicant has had a minimum of three years' experience.

(5) The state director of fire protection may issue a temporary certificate of competency to an applicant who, in his or her judgment, will satisfactorily perform as a certificate of competency holder under the provisions of this chapter. The temporary certificate of competency shall remain in effect for a period of up to three years. The temporary certificate of competency holder shall, within the three-year period, complete the examination requirements specified in subsection (1) of this section. There shall be no examination exemption for an individual issued a temporary certificate of competency. Prior to the expiration of the three-year period, the temporary certificate of competency holder shall make application for a regular certificate of competency. The procedures and qualifications for issuance of a regular certificate of competency shall be applicable to the temporary certificate of competency holder. When a temporary certificate of competency expires, the holder shall cease all activities associated with the holding of a temporary certificate of competency, subject to the penalties contained in this chapter.

(6) To become a licensed fire protection sprinkler system contractor under this chapter, a person or firm must comply with the following:

(a) Must be or have in his or her full-time employ a holder of a valid certificate of competency;

(b) Comply with the minimum insurance requirements of this chapter; and

(c) Make application to the state director of fire protection for a license and pay the fees required.

(7) Each license and certificate of competency issued under this chapter must be posted in a conspicuous place in the fire protection sprinkler system contractor's place of business.

(8) All bids, advertisements, proposals, offers, and installation drawings for fire protection sprinkler systems must prominently display the fire protection sprinkler system contractor's license number.

(9) A certificate of competency or license issued under this chapter is not transferable.

(10) In no case shall a certificate of competency holder be employed full time by more than one fire protection sprinkler system contractor at the same time. If the certificate of competency holder should leave the employment of the fire protection sprinkler system contractor, he or she must notify the state director of fire protection within thirty days. If the certificate of competency holder should leave the employment of the fire protection sprinkler system contractor, the contractor shall have six months or until the expiration of the current license, whichever occurs last, to submit a new application identifying another certificate of competency holder who is at the time of application an owner of the fire protection sprinkler system business or a full-time employee of the fire protection sprinkler system contractor, in order to be issued a new license. If such application is not received and a new license issued within the allotted time, the state director of fire protection shall revoke the license of the fire protection sprinkler system contractor.

[ 2000 c 171 s 36; 1990 c 177 s 5.]